Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB285.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 7149(b) and 7161(f) and (g) of Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7149. Restricted account.* * *(b) Surcharge.--There is assessed as a cost in each case before a magisterial district judge a surcharge of [$5] $10 per docket number in each criminal case and [$5] $10 per named defendant in each civil case in which a constable or deputy constable performs a service provided in Subchapter G (relating to compensation), except that no county shall be required to pay this surcharge on behalf of any indigent or other defendant in a criminal case.* * *123456789101112131415161718 § 7161. Fees.* * *(f) Civil and landlord-tenant cases.--Fees in civil and landlord-tenant cases shall be as follows:(1) For serving complaint, summons or notice on suitor or tenant, either personally or by leaving a copy, [$13] $20, plus [$5] $10 for each additional defendant at the same address, [$2.50] $5 for each return of service, plus mileage.(2) For levying goods, including schedule of property levied upon and set aside, notice of levy and return of service, [$75] $125, plus mileage.(3) For advertising personal property for public sale, [$7] $10 per posting, with a maximum [$21] $30 fee, plus mileage, plus the cost of advertising.(4) For selling goods levied, receipts and returns to court, [$85] $125, plus mileage.(5) For making return of not found, [$13] $20, plus mileage. Payment shall be limited to three returns of not found.(6) For executing order of possession, [$13] $20, plus [$5] $10 for each additional defendant at the same address, [$2.50] $5 for each return of service, plus mileage.(7) For ejectment, [$90] $150, [$2.50] $5 for each return of service, plus mileage.(8) For making any return of service other than not found, [$2.50] $5 each.(9) For providing courtroom security as ordered, [$13] $25 per hour, assessed against one or more parties as determined by the court.(10) Actual mileage for travel by motor vehicle shall be 20250HB0285PN0230 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reimbursed at the rate equal to the highest rate allowed by the Internal Revenue Service. If travel is by other than motor vehicle, reimbursement shall be for vouchered travel expenses.(g) Criminal cases.--Fees in criminal cases shall be as follows:(1) For executing each warrant of arrest or for effectuating the payment of fines and costs by attempting to execute each warrant of arrest, [$25] $50 for each docket number and [$2.50] $5 for each return of service, plus mileage.(2) For taking custody of a defendant, [$5] $25 per defendant.(3) For conveyance of defendant to or from court, [$5] $25 per defendant.(4) For attendance at arraignment or hearing, [$13] $25.(5) For executing discharge, [$5] $25 per defendant.(6) For executing commitment, [$5] $25 per defendant.(7) For executing release, [$5] $25 per defendant.(8) For making returns to the court, [$2.50] $5.(9) Transporting each nonincarcerated defendant to jail, [$17] $25, plus mileage; transporting an incarcerated prisoner, [$38] $50 per prisoner, plus an hourly rate of [$13] $25 per hour, plus mileage. Computation of hourly rate will apply after the expiration of the first hour per prisoner per hour, not to exceed [$26] $50 per hour per constable.(10) Receipt of the fees for transporting a nonincarcerated defendant under paragraph (9) shall not exclude receipt of the fees under paragraphs (6) and (8) for 20250HB0285PN0230 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that transport.(11) Receipt of the fees for transporting an incarcerated prisoner under paragraph (9) shall exclude receipt of the fees under paragraphs (2), (3), (4) and (7) for the transport.(12) Actual mileage for travel by motor vehicle shall be reimbursed at the rate equal to the highest rate allowed by the Internal Revenue Service. If travel is by other than motor vehicle, reimbursement shall be for vouchered travel expenses.(13) For conveying defendants for fingerprinting, [$17] $25 per defendant, plus [$13] $25 per hour beyond the first hour per defendant per hour, not to exceed [$26] $50 per hour per constable, plus mileage.(14) For holding one or more defendants at the office of a magisterial district judge, [$13] $25 per hour per defendant beyond the first half hour.(15) For courtroom security as ordered, [$13] $25 per hour, assessed against one or more parties as determined by the court.(16) In all criminal cases wherein the defendant is discharged or indigent or the case is otherwise dismissed, the court shall assess to the county the fee provided in this section, except that, in cases of private criminal complaints where the defendant is discharged prior to the indictment or the filing of any information or the case is otherwise dismissed at the summary offense hearing, the court shall assess the fee to the affiant.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0285PN0230 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930